Arkansas, session 2025, HB1951.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative findings.
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Certain domain extensions are restricted to government entities in
the United States;
(2) When users see a website with a ".gov", a ".mil", or a ".edu"
extension, they can be confident that it is an official government website;
(3) Using a government extension provides an additional layer of
security, as it requires stringent verification processes to obtain, reducing
the likelihood of phishing scams and other fraudulent activities;
(4) A government extension signifies that the website is an official
source of government information or services, helping to ensure that members
of the public have access to accurate and reliable information from trusted
sources; and
(5) Using a government extension reinforces government accountability
and transparency, as it clearly identifies official government entities and
their online presence.
*LJH019*
04-03-2025 11:59:58 LJH019

As Engrossed: H4/3/25 HB1951

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 1, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
6-1-109. Public institutionally accredited postsecondary or higher
education institution websites — Use of authorized domain extension —
Definition.
(a) As used in this section, "public institutionally accredited
postsecondary or higher education institution" means a public postsecondary
or higher education institution that holds an institutional accreditation by
an agency on the United States Department of Education's list of
Institutional Accrediting Agencies as it existed on January 1, 2025.
(b) A public institutionally accredited postsecondary or higher
education institution shall use a ".edu" top level domain for:
(1) The website address for the website, if any, of the public
institutionally accredited postsecondary or higher education institution; and
(2) Any email addresses made available by the public
institutionally accredited postsecondary or higher education institution for
use by the:
(A) Public institutionally accredited postsecondary or
higher education institution; and
(B) Employees of the public institutionally accredited
postsecondary or higher education institution.
(c) A public institutionally accredited postsecondary or higher
education institution may operate a website that uses a sponsored top-level
domain that is not a ".edu" domain if:
(1) A reasonable person would not mistake the website as the
primary website of the public institutionally accredited postsecondary or
higher education institution; and
(2) The website of the public institutionally accredited
postsecondary or higher education institution is:
(A) Solely for internal use and not intended for use by
members of the public;
(B) Temporary and in use by the public institutionally
accredited postsecondary or higher education institution for a period of no
more than one (1) calendar year;
(C) Related to an event, program, or informational
04-03-2025 11:59:58 LJH019

As Engrossed: H4/3/25 HB1951
campaign operated by the public institutionally accredited postsecondary or
higher education institution in partnership with another person or entity
that is not a governmental entity; or
(D) Related to a collegiate athletics program.
(d) The Arkansas Higher Education Coordinating Board may authorize a
waiver of the requirements of subsection (b) of this section if:
(1) There are extraordinary circumstances under which use of an
".edu" top level domain extension would cause demonstrable harm to members of
the public or businesses; and
(2) A representative of the public institutionally accredited
postsecondary or higher education institution submits a written request to
the board that includes a justification for the waiver.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code Title 14, Chapter 1, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
14-1-112. Municipal government — Use of authorized domain extension.
(a) A municipal government shall use a ".gov" sponsored top-level
domain for:
(1) The website address for the website, if any, of the
municipal government; and
(2) Any email addresses made available by the municipal
government for use by the:
(A) Municipal government; and
(B) Employees of the municipal government.
(b) A municipal government may operate a website that uses a sponsored
top-level domain that is not a ".gov" domain if:
(1) A reasonable person would not mistake the website as the
primary website of the municipal government; and
(2) The website of the municipal government is:
(A) Solely for internal use and not intended for use by
members of the public;
(B) Temporary and in use by the municipal government for a
period of no more than one (1) year; or
(C) Related to an event, program, or informational
campaign operated by the municipal government in partnership with another
person or entity that is not a governmental entity.
04-03-2025 11:59:58 LJH019

As Engrossed: H4/3/25 HB1951
(c) The Legislative Council may authorize a waiver of the requirements
of subsection (a) of this section if:
(1) There are extraordinary circumstances under which use of a
".gov" sponsored top-level domain extension would cause demonstrable harm to
citizens or businesses; and
(2) A representative of the municipal government submits a
written request to the Legislative Council that includes a justification for
the waiver.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code Title 25, Chapter 1, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
25-1-131. State agencies, boards, or commissions — Use of authorized
domain extension — Definition.
(a) As used in this section, "state agency, board, or commission"
means a state agency, board, or commission established by law, except for a
board or commission that primarily serves a public institutionally accredited
postsecondary or higher education institution and that makes available to
members email addresses with a ".edu" top-level domain.
(b) A state agency, board, or commission shall use a ".gov" or a
".mil" sponsored top-level domain for:
(1) The website address for the website, if any, of the state
agency, board, or commission; and
(2) Any email addresses made available by the state agency,
board, or commission for use by the:
(A) State agency, board, or commission; and
(B) Employees of the state agency, board, or commission.
(c) A state agency, board, or commission may operate a website that
uses a sponsored top-level domain that is not a ".gov" or a ".mil" domain if:
(1) A reasonable person would not mistake the website as the
primary website of the state agency, board, or commission; and
(2) The website of the state agency, board, or commission is:
(A) Solely for internal use and not intended for use by
members of the public;
(B) Temporary and in use by the state agency, board, or
commission for a period of no more than one (1) year; or
(C) Related to an event, program, or informational
04-03-2025 11:59:58 LJH019

As Engrossed: H4/3/25 HB1951
campaign operated by the state agency, board, or commission in partnership
with another person or entity that is not a governmental entity.
(d) The Legislative Council may authorize a waiver of the requirements
of subsection (b) of this section if:
(1) There are extraordinary circumstances under which use of a
".gov" or a ".mil" top-level domain extension would cause demonstrable harm
to citizens or businesses; and
(2) The secretary, chair, or other principal of the state
agency, board, or commission submits a written request to the Legislative
Council that includes a justification for the waiver.

SECTION 5. DO NOT CODIFY. Effective date.
This act is effective on and after June 1, 2026, except as to cities
and towns that have a population of fewer than ten thousand (10,000)
inhabitants, which will be required to comply with this act on and after
January 1, 2027.

/s/A. Collins


















04-03-2025 11:59:58 LJH019